Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of sections 49 to 59,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 2. (1) In lieu of amending its urban  growth boundary under any other process
provided by sections 49 to 59, chapter 110,  Oregon Laws 2024, the City of Monmouth may
amend its  urban growth boundary to add one or more sites to the urban growth boundary
and to remove one or more tracts of land from the urban growth boundary as provided  in
this section.
(2) The area to be removed under this section:
(a) May not exceed 90 acres;
(b) Must have more than one-quarter of its  acreage within an area mapped as flood
hazard or wetland;
(c) May not have been annexed by the city;
(d) Must be designated for residential use on the city’s comprehensive plan map; and
(e) May not be currently served by city sewer service.
(3) The site to be added under this section:
(a) May not exceed 75 net residential acres;
(b) Must be contiguous to the boundary  of the city and the city’s existing urban growth
boundary;
(c) May  not have more than 25 percent of its acreage within an area mapped as a flood
hazard or wetland;
(d) Must be able to connect to nearby water and sewer services; and
(e) Must be owned by owners that have consented to having the site:
(A) Added to the urban growth boundary; and
(B) Annexed by the city.
(4) Land may  be removed from an urban growth boundary under this section without
landowner consent.  ORS 195.305 to 195.336 do not apply to the removal of land from the urban
growth boundary under this section.
(5) Review of an exchange  of lands made under this section may only be made by the
county as provided in section 50 (2), chapter 110,  Oregon Laws 2024, and by the Department
of Land Conservation and Development,  subject to judicial review, as provided in section 57,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
Enrolled House Bill 2647 (HB 2647-B) Page 1
(6)(a) Sections 52, 53, 54, 55 and 56, chapter 110,  Oregon Laws 2024, do not apply to a site
addition made under this section.
(b) A site addition made under this section is not required to  meet the conditions listed
in section 50 (1)(a) to (g), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 3.  Section 57, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 57.  (1) Within 21 days after the adoption of  an amendment to an urban growth boundary
or the adoption or amendment of a conceptual plan under sections 49 to 59 , chapter 110, Oregon
Laws 2024 [of this 2024 Act ], and the approval by a county if required under section 50 (2) , chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2024  [ of this 2024 Act ], the conceptual plan or amendment must  be submitted to
the Department of Land Conservation and Development for review. The submission must be  made
by:
(a) The city, for an  amendment under section 50 or 58 , chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, or
section 2 of this 2025 Act  [ of this 2024 Act ]; or
(b) Metro, for an amendment under  section 51 or 58 , chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024  [ of this
2024 Act ].
(2) Within 60  days after receiving a submittal under subsection (1) of this section, the depart-
ment shall:
(a) Review the submittal for compliance with the provisions of sections 49 to 59 , chapter 110,
Oregon Laws 2024 [ of this 2024 Act ].
(b)(A) If the submittal substantially complies with the provisions of sections 49  to 59 , chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2024  [ of this 2024 Act ], issue an order approving the submittal; or
(B) If the submittal does not substantially comply with the provisions of sections 49 to 59 ,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024  [ of this 2024 Act ], issue an  order remanding the submittal to the
city or to Metro  with a specific determination of deficiencies in the submittal and with sufficient
detail to identify a specific remedy for any deficiency in a subsequent resubmittal.
(3) If a conceptual plan is remanded to Metro under subsection (2)(b) of this section:
(a) The department shall notify the city; and
(b) The city may amend its conceptual plan and resubmit a petition to  Metro under section 51 ,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024  [ of this 2024 Act ].
(4) Judicial review of the department’s order:
(a) Must be as a review of orders other than a contested case under ORS 183.484; and
(b) May be initiated only by the city or an owner of a proposed site.
(5) Following the approval of a submittal under this section, a local government must include
the added  lands in any future inventory of buildable lands or determination of housing capacity
under ORS 197A.270, 197A.280, 197A.335 or 197A.350.
SECTION 4.
 Section 60, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 60. (1) Sections 49 to [ 59 of this 2024 Act ] 56, 58 and 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024,
are repealed on January 2, 2033.
(2) Section 57, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by  section 3 of this 2025 Act,
is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(3) Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2033.
Enrolled House Bill 2647 (HB 2647-B) Page 2
Passed by House April 22, 2025
Repassed by House June 9, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2647 (HB 2647-B) Page 3